Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2796.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5533YH (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. 2796 Section 1. Section 453A.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. There is imposed, and shall be collected and paid to the 3 department, a tax on all cigarettes used or otherwise disposed 4 of in this state for any purpose equal to six fourteen and 5 eight-tenths three-tenths cents on each cigarette. 6 Sec. 2. Section 453A.6, subsection 8, paragraph a, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. Pay directly to the department, in lieu of the tax under 9 subsection 1 , a tax equal to three and six six and forty-three 10 hundredths cents on each cigarette dispensed from such machine. 11 Payments made under this paragraph shall be remitted to the 12 department electronically. 13